Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1007
Cultural development, defined.

Cultural development
means a real estate development with a primary purpose of promoting cultural
education or development, such as a museum or related visual arts centers,
performing arts facility, or facilities housing, incubating, developing, or
promoting art, music, theater, dance, zoology, botany, natural history, cultural
history, or the sciences.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 7.